Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.48
Capitol furniture; sections; purposes.

The purposes of sections 81-1108.48 to 81-1108.53 are to:

(1) Provide for identification and classification of all original capitol furniture;

(2) Provide a central inventory of original capitol furniture;

(3) Provide for the return of all identified original furniture to the capitol; and

(4) Provide for distribution and assignment of original capitol furniture.

Laws 1980, LB 885, § 1.